Vermont statutes. Title 16 Education
Article 1. General Provisions

§ 471.
Application of other laws.

The provisions of this title relating to the administration and maintenance of public schools; to school meetings and voting; to grand lists; to the raising and expending of school monies; to monies apportioned by the State Board; to sharing in other State aid; to the election, appointment, powers, duties, and liabilities of school officers; to elementary and higher instruction; to transportation, board, and attendance of students; to truancy and truant officers; to furnishing of textbooks and appliances; and to all other matters pertaining to schools in a town district, unless otherwise provided, and if not inconsistent with the rights granted by their charters, shall apply to schools maintained, similar school officers, and all matters pertaining to schools in incorporated school districts.

An incorporated school district, if it is so voted at an annual or special meeting duly warned for that purpose, may elect to be governed by any one or more provisions of this title in lieu of any inconsistent provisions of special legislation relating to such district. Provisions of this title adopted by a district shall continue to apply unless the vote is rescinded at an annual or special meeting duly warned for that purpose.

HISTORY:

Amended

2013, No. 92

(Adj. Sess.), § 49, eff. Feb. 14, 2014;

2019, No. 131

(Adj. Sess.), § 61.

§ 472.
Meetings; warnings.

A district may, if it so votes at its annual meeting on the first Tuesday in March, fix a different date for holding its annual meetings, provided the date is not earlier than March 15 nor later than June 30. A notice of the proposed change shall be inserted in the warning of the annual meeting upon the written request of five percent of the voters of the district. Special meetings shall be warned on the application of five percent of the voters of the district.

Meetings shall be warned by the clerk or, in case of his or her inability to act, by the prudential committee, by posting a notice specifying the time, place, and business of the meeting in two public places in the district at least seven days before the date of the meeting, and warnings shall be recorded before being posted.

When a person whose duty it is to warn a school meeting neglects to do so for ten days, after application made as provided in this section, he or she shall forfeit to the district $20.00 for each ten days’ neglect, to be recovered in an action on this statute.

HISTORY:

Amended

1975, No. 161

(Adj. Sess.);

2013, No. 92

(Adj. Sess.), § 50, eff. Feb. 14, 2014;

2019, No. 131

(Adj. Sess.), § 62.

§ 473.
Eligibility of voters.

The moderator, clerk, and members of the prudential committee shall decide all questions as to the eligibility of a person to vote in a school meeting.

§ 474.
Records.

The clerk shall keep a record of the votes and proceedings of the school district meetings and give certified copies thereof when required.
A clerk who neglects to perform this duty shall forfeit $20.00 to the district, to be recovered in an action on this statute.

§ 475.
Statistical information.

Annually, on or before August 15, the prudential committee shall return to the Secretary answers to the statistical inquiries that he or she may address to them.

HISTORY:

Amended

1975, No. 48

, § 4, eff. April 15, 1975;

2013, No. 92

(Adj. Sess.), § 51, eff. Feb. 14, 2014.

§ 476.
Repealed.
1975, No. 48, § 14, eff. April 15, 1975.

§ 477.
Merger of town and incorporated school districts.

An incorporated school district, by a majority vote of the legal voters present and voting at any meeting legally warned, may surrender its charter as a corporation for the maintenance of public schools or such part of its charter as pertains to the maintenance of public schools. Such surrender shall take effect not later than July 1 following the vote so taken, and such school corporation shall cease to exist, and it shall become thereby a part of the town school district. In the event of any such merger notwithstanding the provisions of section 423 of this title, the directors of the incorporated school district holding office at the time of the merger shall become members of the board of school directors of the town school district and shall continue in that office until the expiration of the terms for which they were elected by the incorporated school district.

By a majority vote of the legal voters present and voting at any meeting legally warned, a town district may become a part of an incorporated district, provided the incorporated district, at a meeting legally warned, votes to accept such merger. Such merger shall take effect July 1 following the vote so taken. When such a merger has occurred, the incorporated district shall be considered a town district in all respects pertaining to the maintenance and administration of its public schools.

In case of a union of an incorporated district and a town district under either subsection (a) or (b) of this section, each district shall settle its own business affairs and pay all its indebtedness, except for repairs and new buildings, shall deposit its records with the town clerk, and shall no longer exist except for the settlement of its own pecuniary affairs. In effecting such settlement, a district may remain in existence for not more than five years for the purpose only of voting, assessing, and collecting a special tax annually to pay such indebtedness.

HISTORY:

Amended

1964, No. 7

(Sp. Sess.), eff. March 4, 1964.

§ 478.
Prudential committee; vacancies.

Unless the incorporated district has a provision in its charter to the contrary, when a vacancy occurs on a prudential committee, the remaining members shall appoint a person to fill the vacancy until the next annual or special meeting. The members shall choose the new member by majority vote of those present and voting.

HISTORY:

Added

2003, No. 112

(Adj. Sess.), § 1.